uz_Cyrl_UZ/uz_Cyrl_UZ.aff
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасмиди [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасмидик [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасмидингиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасмидилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасмидингизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмассанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмассизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмасларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингизмассизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганлигингиз-чи [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлари [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларини [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларининг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларига [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларида [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлариман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимас [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимаслар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлариманми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимисан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларими [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимизми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимисиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасманми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмисан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмизми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмисиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлариманку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисанку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларику [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлариларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисизларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасманку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассанку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимаску [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассизларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимиканман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимикансан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимикан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимиканмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимикансиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимиканмилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимиканмисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидир [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдир [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларидирсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасдирсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимидим [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимидинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимиди [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимидик [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимидингиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимидилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимидингизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмидим [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмидинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмиди [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмидик [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмидингиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмидилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмидингизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлариманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлариларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларисизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимасларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликларимассизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 ганликлари-чи [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигим [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимни [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимнинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимга [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммас [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммаслар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимманми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммисан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммизми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммисиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасманми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмисан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмизми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмисиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимманку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсанку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсизларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасманку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассанку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммаску [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассизларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммиканман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммикансан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммикан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммиканмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммикансиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммиканмилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммиканмисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдир [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдир [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимдирсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасдирсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммидим [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммидинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммиди [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммидик [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммидингиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммидилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммидингизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмидим [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмидинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмиди [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмидик [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмидингиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмидилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмидингизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигимсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммасларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигиммассизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигим-чи [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингни [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингнинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингга [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигинглар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмас [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмаслар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингманми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмисан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмизми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмисиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасманми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмисан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмизми [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмисиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингманку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсанку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсизларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасманку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассанку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмаску [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассизку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассизларку [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмиканман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмикансан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмикан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмиканмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмикансиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмиканмилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмиканмисизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдир [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирман [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирсан [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдир [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирмиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирсиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирсизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингдирсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасдирсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмидим [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмидинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмиди [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмидик [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмидингиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмидилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмидингизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмидим [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмидинг [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмиди [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмидик [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмидингиз [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмидилар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмидингизлар [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингсизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасманда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассанда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасмизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассизда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмасларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигингмассизларда [^гқ]		
SFX J 0 маганлигинг-чи [^гқ]		
